Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 2. Health Provisions.
§ 22.1-274.2.
Possession and administration of inhaled asthma medications and epinephrine by certain students or school board employees.

Local school boards shall develop and implement policies permitting a student with a diagnosis of asthma or anaphylaxis, or both, to possess and self-administer inhaled asthma medications or auto-injectable epinephrine, or both, as the case may be, during the school day, at school-sponsored activities, or while on a school bus or other school property. Such policies shall include, but not be limited to, provisions for:

Written consent of the parent, as defined in § 22.1-1, of a student with a diagnosis of asthma or anaphylaxis, or both, that the student may self-administer inhaled asthma medications or auto-injectable epinephrine, or both, as the case may be.

Written notice from the student’s primary care provider or medical specialist, or a licensed physician or licensed nurse practitioner that (i) identifies the student; (ii) states that the student has a diagnosis of asthma or anaphylaxis, or both, and has approval to self-administer inhaled asthma medications or auto-injectable epinephrine, or both, as the case may be, that have been prescribed or authorized for the student; (iii) specifies the name and dosage of the medication, the frequency in which it is to be administered and certain circumstances which may warrant the use of inhaled asthma medications or auto-injectable epinephrine, such as before exercising or engaging in physical activity to prevent the onset of asthma symptoms or to alleviate asthma symptoms after the onset of an asthma episode; and (iv) attests to the student’s demonstrated ability to safely and effectively self-administer inhaled asthma medications or auto-injectable epinephrine, or both, as the case may be.

Development of an individualized health care plan, including emergency procedures for any life-threatening conditions.

Consultation with the student’s parent before any limitations or restrictions are imposed upon a student’s possession and self-administration of inhaled asthma medications and auto-injectable epinephrine, and before the permission to possess and self-administer inhaled asthma medications and auto-injectable epinephrine at any point during the school year is revoked.

Self-administration of inhaled asthma medications and auto-injectable epinephrine to be consistent with the purposes of the Virginia School Health Guidelines and the Guidelines for Specialized Health Care Procedure Manuals, which are jointly issued by the Department of Education and the Department of Health.

Disclosure or dissemination of information pertaining to the health condition of a student to school board employees to comply with §§ 22.1-287 and 22.1-289 and the federal Family Education Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, as amended, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, which govern the disclosure and dissemination of information contained in student scholastic records.

The permission granted a student with a diagnosis of asthma or anaphylaxis, or both, to possess and self-administer inhaled asthma medications or auto-injectable epinephrine, or both, shall be effective for one school year. Permission to possess and self-administer such medications shall be renewed annually. For the purposes of this section, “one school year” means 365 calendar days.

Local school boards shall adopt and implement policies for the possession and administration of epinephrine in every school, to be administered by any school nurse, employee of the school board, employee of a local governing body, or employee of a local health department who is authorized by a prescriber and trained in the administration of epinephrine to any student believed to be having an anaphylactic reaction. Such policies shall require that at least one school nurse, employee of the school board, employee of a local governing body, or employee of a local health department who is authorized by a prescriber and trained in the administration of epinephrine has the means to access at all times during regular school hours any such epinephrine that is stored in a locked or otherwise generally inaccessible container or area.

Each local school board shall adopt and implement policies for the possession and administration of undesignated stock albuterol inhalers and valved holding chambers in every public school in the local school division, to be administered by any school nurse, employee of the school board, employee of a local governing body, or employee of a local health department who is authorized by the local health director and trained in the administration of albuterol inhalers and valved holding chambers for any student believed in good faith to be in need of such medication.

History.

2000, c. 871; 2005, c. 785; 2012, cc. 787, 833; 2013, cc. 336, 617; 2020, c. 476; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 508.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2000, c. 871, cl. 2 provides: “That the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall notify local school boards of the passage of this act by a Superintendent’s Administrative Memorandum within 30 days of its enactment.”

Acts
2005, c. 785, cl. 2, provides: “That the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall notify local school boards of the passage of this act by a Superintendent’s Administrative Memorandum within 30 days of its enactment.”

Acts
2012, cc. 787 and
833, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Health, in conjunction with the Department of Education and the Department of Health Professionals, shall develop and implement policies for the recognition and treatment of anaphylaxis in the school setting. Such departments shall develop policies with input from, but not limited to, representatives of the following organizations and entities: local school boards, the Virginia Association of School Nurses, the Virginia Nurses Association, the Virginia Chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics, the Medical Society of Virginia, and the Office of the Attorney General. Such departments shall identify and develop appropriate revisions to the ‘Virginia School Health Guidelines’ related but not limited to (i) development of a plan for the issuance and implementation of oral or written orders or standing protocols; (ii) consideration of who may qualify as a prescriber for local school divisions, including local health department directors, operational medical directors, and school health directors; (iii) specification of training needs and requirements for the administration of epinephrine; (iv) appropriate liability protections; and (v) any issues requiring statutory or regulatory amendment. Such departments shall provide guidelines to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for dissemination by no later than July 1, 2012.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 508, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Education, in conjunction with the Department of Health, shall develop and implement policies for the administration of stock albuterol in public schools for inclusion in the Department of Education’s “Guidelines for Managing Asthma in Virginia Schools: A Team Approach” document. Such departments shall develop policies with input from representatives of local school boards, the Virginia Association of School Nurses, the Virginia Chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics, and such other organizations and entities as such departments deem appropriate. Such departments shall identify and develop appropriate revisions to the “Virginia School Health Guidelines” relating to, but not limited to, the specification of training needs and requirements for the administration of albuterol. Such departments shall provide guidelines to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for dissemination no later than September 30, 2021.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 508, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 785 inserted “or anaphylaxis, or both,” in subsections A and B and subdivisions A 1 and A 2, and “or auto-injectable epinephrine, or both, as the case may be” in subsection A and subdivisions A 1 and A 2; in subdivision A 2, inserted “or auto-injectable epinephrine,” and substituted “asthma” for “asthmatic” three times in clause (iii); inserted “and auto-injectable epinephrine” in subdivisions A 4 and A 5; and substituted “such” for “inhaled asthma” preceding “medications” in subsection B.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 787 and 833 are identical, and deleted “Effective on July 1, 2000” at the beginning of subsection A and added subsection C.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by c. 336, effective March 14, 2013, and c. 617, effective March 20, 2013, are identical, and in subsection C, substituted “2013-2014” for “2012-13,” “any school nurse” for “a school nurse or an,” and inserted “employee of a local governing body, or employee of a local health department who is authorized by a prescriber.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 476, in subsection C, deleted “By the beginning of the 2013-2014 school year” at the beginning and added the second sentence.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 508, effective July 1, 2022, added subsection D.

Cross references.

As to civil immunity for school board employees supervising self-administration of certain medication, see §

8.01-226.5:1

.

§ 22.1-274.3.
Policies regarding medication recommendations by school personnel.

The Board of Education shall develop and implement policies prohibiting school personnel from recommending the use of psychotropic medications for any student. Such policies shall not prohibit school health staff, classroom teachers or other school professionals from recommending that a student be evaluated by an appropriate medical practitioner, or prohibit school personnel from consulting with such practitioner, with the written consent of the student’s parent.

For the purposes of this section, “psychotropic medications” means those medications the prescribed intention of which is to alter mental activity or state, including, but not limited to, antipsychotic, antidepressant, and anxiolytic medication and behavior-altering medication.

History.

2002, c. 314.

Law Review.

For article surveying developments in education law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 89 (2002).

§ 22.1-274.4.
Automated external defibrillators.

Each local school board may develop a plan to allow for the placement, care, and use, and funding of an automated external defibrillator in every school.

History.

2013, cc. 498, 530.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 498 and 530, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education, in conjunction with the Department of Health, shall adopt regulations and establish guidelines to implement the provisions of this act.”

§ 22.1-274.5.
Topical sunscreen.

Any public elementary or secondary school student may possess and use unscented topical sunscreen in its original packaging on a school bus, on school property, or at a school-sponsored event without a note or prescription from a licensed health care professional if the topical sunscreen is approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration for nonprescription use for the purpose of limiting damage to skin caused by exposure to ultraviolet light.

History.

2020, c. 579.

§ 22.1-274.6.
Seizure management and action plan; training.

The parent or guardian of a student with a diagnosed seizure disorder may submit to the local school division a seizure management and action plan developed by the student’s treating physician for review by school division employees with whom the student has regular contact. The seizure management and action plan shall (i) identify the health care services the student may receive at school or while participating in a school activity, (ii) identify seizure-related medication prescribed to the student that must be administered in the event of a seizure, (iii) evaluate the student’s ability to manage and understand his seizure disorder, and (iv) be signed by the student’s parent or guardian, the student’s treating physician, and the school nurse. Each such seizure management and action plan shall state that (a) such plan is separate from any individualized education program (IEP) or Section 504 Plan that is in place for the student and (b) nothing in such plan shall be construed to abrogate any provision of any IEP or Section 504 Plan that is in place for the student.

Each local school division shall require all school nurses employed by the division to complete, on a biennial basis, a Board of Education-approved online course of instruction for school nurses regarding treating students with seizures and seizure disorders that includes information about seizure recognition and related first aid. Approved training programs shall be fully consistent with training programs and guidelines developed by the Epilepsy Foundation of America and any successor organization.

Each local school division shall require all employees whose duties include regular contact with students to complete, on a biennial basis, a Board of Education-approved online course of instruction for school employees regarding treating students with seizures and seizure disorders that includes information about seizure recognition and related first aid. Approved training programs shall be fully consistent with training programs and guidelines developed by the Epilepsy Foundation of America and any successor organization.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 514.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 514, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2022.”

§ 22.1-275.
Protective eye devices.

Every student and teacher in any school or institution of higher education shall be required to wear industrial quality eye protective devices while participating in any of the following courses or laboratories:

Career and technical education shops or laboratories involving experience with:

Hot molten metals,

Milling, sawing, turning, shaping, cutting, grinding, or stamping of any solid materials,

Heat treatment, tempering, or kiln firing of any metal or other materials,

Gas or electric arc welding,

Repair of any vehicle, or

Caustic or explosive materials;

Chemical or combined chemical-physical laboratories involving caustic or explosive chemicals or hot liquids or solids.The governing board or authority of any public or private school or the governing board of each institution of higher education shall furnish the eye protective devices prescribed in this section free of charge or at cost to the students and teachers of the school participating in such courses or laboratories; however, such devices may be furnished by parents or guardians of such students. Eye protective devices shall be furnished to all visitors to such courses.“Industrial quality eye protective devices,” as used in this section, means devices providing side protection and meeting the standards of the American Standards Association Safety Code for Head, Eye, and Respiratory Protection, Z2.1-1959, promulgated by the American Standards Association, Inc.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-10.2; 1966, c. 69; 1980, c. 559; 2001, c. 483.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission,
the following changes were made to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588: in the introductory paragraph, substituted “or institution of higher education” for “college, or university”; and in the next to last paragraph, substituted “board of each institution of higher education” for “body of each institution of higher learning.”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 2, provides: “That this act shall not be construed to require any local school board to rename its vocational schools or programs or to require any public or private vocational school to change its name; however, any public school having in its name the terms vocational or vocational technical or any variation of these terms and designated by a local school board to be a vocational or vocational technical school shall comply with the relevant requirements for career and technical education set forth in Title 22.1 of the Code of Virginia and the applicable regulations.”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 3, provides: “That nothing contained in this act shall be construed to require expenditure of funds to realign any name with the term ‘career and technical education’ or to require any redesigning or reprinting of any logo, stationery, informational material or website. In addition, any stationery, pamphlets or other printed material referring to vocational education or some other term denoting career and technical education requiring an eventual revision of a state program or name may continue to be used in the normal course of business until consumed before being redesigned and reprinted.”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 4, provides: “That, further, whenever any references are used in the Code of Virginia to vocational education or to vocational technical education or, when used to denote an education program, to vocational rehabilitation or any other state or local program name that clearly relates to career and technical education within its context, such terms shall be deemed to be subsumed by, synonymous with and included in the term ‘career and technical education.’ ”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 5, provides: “That this act shall not be construed to require any additional services or changes in services in any state or local program or to require any such program to deliver different services than are required by applicable law.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 483 substituted “Career and technical education” for Vocational or industrial arts” at the beginning of subdivision 1, inserted “or” at the end of subdivision 1 e, and substituted “however” for “provided, however, that” in the second paragraph of the section.

§ 22.1-275.1.
School health advisory board.

Each school board may establish a school health advisory board of no more than 20 members which shall consist of broad-based community representation including, but not limited to, parents, students, health professionals, educators, and others. If established, the school health advisory board shall assist with the development of health policy in the school division and the evaluation of the status of school health, health education, the school environment, and health services.

Any school health advisory board shall hold meetings at least semi-annually and shall annually report on the status and needs of student health in the school division to any relevant school, the school board, the Virginia Department of Health, and the Virginia Department of Education.

The local school board may request that the school health advisory board recommend to the local school board procedures relating to children with acute or chronic illnesses or conditions, including, but not limited to, appropriate emergency procedures for any life-threatening conditions and designation of school personnel to implement the appropriate emergency procedures. The procedures relating to children with acute or chronic illnesses or conditions shall be developed with due consideration of the size and staffing of the schools within the jurisdiction.

History.

1990, c. 315; 1992, c. 174; 1999, c. 570; 2012, cc. 805, 836.

The 1999 amendment

added the last paragraph.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 805 and 836 are nearly identical, and in the first paragraph, substituted “may establish” for “shall establish” in the first sentence, and inserted “If established” at the beginning of the second sentence; and substituted “Any school health advisory board” for “The school health advisory board” at the beginning of the second paragraph. In addition, Acts 2012, c. 836, substituted “20” for “twenty” in the first sentence of the first paragraph.